src/fst/phonology.xfscript
#
# Tsuut'ina morphophonology
#

define vowel [a|á|à|à2|i|í|ì|o|ó|ò|u|ú|ù];
define unmarkedVowel [a|i|o|u];
define highToneVowel [á|í|ó|ú];
define lowToneVowel [à|ì|ò|ù];
define consonant [b|c|d|g|h|j|k|l|ł|m|n|p|s|t|w|x|y|z|ʔ|%'];


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to tone.
#

# The distributive plural dà- has slightly different tonal behaviour compared
# to other low-tone prefixes in Tsuut'ina: before 0-IPFV 1PL isaà-/isiì-, dà-
# combines to form dààsaà-/dààsiì- (i.e., LM -> LL, e.g., dààsaàtsiy "each and
# every one of us is crying", from dà- + isaàtsiy), rather than the expected
# *daasaà-/*daasiì- (i.e., LM -> MM, as is found in all other LM contexts).
# In all other contexts, dà- behaves tonally like any other low-marked prefix.
#
# We model this by representing the low-tone à in distributive plural dà- with
# the multi-character symbol <à2>, then targetting the <i2> moraic /i/ that 
# represents the initial vowel in 0-IPFV 1PL isaà-/isiì-.
define distributivePlural1PLToneSandhi [ à2 "." i2 -> à ì .o. à2 -> à ];

# Define LH -> MH (e.g., shì-á -> shaá, as in shaásʔín "I prepared food, made
# a feast", dà-á -> daá, as in daátłiyaàʔí "each and every one of us saw each
# other") HL -> HM (e.g., ná-ì -> náa, as in náaya "he/she got up"), and 
# LM -> MM (e.g., xà-i -> xaa, as in xaaʔò "s/he took something out", from
# xà- i- DOBJ.INDEF ʔò "handle solid object")
define toneSandhi à -> a, ì -> i, ò -> o, ù -> u || _ highToneVowel,
                                                    highToneVowel _,
                                                    _ unmarkedVowel;

# Certain high-tone prefixes in Tsuut'ina (e.g., tsí- "flee", or í- from 
# historical *uˑ-) spread high tone rightward onto unmarked syllables,
# stopping at the first inflectional chunk (e.g., íts'idiyískid "they were
# asked" comes out as íts'ídíyískid, with high tone spreading from í- onto
# ts'i- and di-, but stopping at yi-).  We mark this spreading high tone
# in lexical entries as an ^H after the vowel (e.g., tsí^H, í^H)
#
# For now, this rule applies to sequences of at most three unmarked syllables
# that appear after a spreading high tone.  If it turns out that there are
# words with a spreading high tone that involve more than three unmarked
# syllables before the inflectional chunk, this rule will need to change.
define hToneSpreadAfterMid a -> á, i -> í, o -> ó, u -> ú || _ "^H";
define hToneSpread a a -> á á, a -> á, 
                   i i -> í í, i -> í,
                   o o -> ó ó, o -> ó,
                   u u -> ú ú, u -> ú || 
                        "^H" (consonant)+ _, 
                        "^H" (consonant)+ (unmarkedVowel)+ (consonant)+ _,
                        "^H" (consonant)+ (unmarkedVowel)+ 
                          (consonant)+ (unmarkedVowel)+ (consonant)+ _;
define hToneSpreadCleanup "^H" -> 0;

regex [ hToneSpreadAfterMid .o. hToneSpread .o. hToneSpreadCleanup ];
define hToneSpreading;

# The ì- transitional (Leer 1996/2005) or inchoative/semelfactive (K. Rice
# 2000) prefix behaves differently from all other tone-bearing prefixes in
# Tsuut'ina, pulling down the tone of neighbouring vowels without adding a
# mora (e.g., gùja ánìstłàg "I did you (sg.) good", from á= ni_ ^L . is làg,
# with L . is -> ìs; gùja ásilàg "you (sg.) did me good", from á= si_ ^L .
# í làg, with ^L . í -> i).
# 
# In the case of TAMA chunks, this prefix causes both short and level long
# vowels to drop by one level (e.g., í -> i, íí -> ii, etc.), while leaving
# contour tones (specifically, 0-IPFV 1PL aà/iì) unaffected.  In all other
# cases, only one mora is lowered (e.g., nánaàyistsòni "I will see you (pl.)
# again", from ná= naa_ ^L . yis tsòni, where naa ^L -> naà, rather than *nàà).
# To model this, we represent this prefix's tone as ^L, adjusting TAMA chunk
# tones first (i.e., apply the lowering to any vowel sequences immediately
# after the "." boundary marker), then to any adjacent vowel immediately to
# the left of this prefix.
define lToneLowerRight [ "." "^L" á á -> "." a a      .o.
                         "." "^L" á -> "." a          .o.
                         "." "^L" a à -> "." a à      .o.
                         "." "^L" a a -> "." à à      .o.
                         "." "^L" a -> "." à          .o.
                         "." "^L" í í -> "." i i      .o.
                         "." "^L" í -> "." i          .o.
                         "." "^L" i ì -> "." i ì      .o.
                         "." "^L" i i -> "." ì ì      .o.
                         "." "^L" i -> "." ì          .o.
                         "." "^L" ì -> "." ì          .o.
                         "." "^L" i2 -> "." ì ];
define lToneLowerLeft  á -> a, a -> à, í -> i, i -> ì,
                       ó -> o, o -> ò, ú -> u, u -> ù || _ "." "^L";
define lToneCleanup "^L" -> 0;

regex [ lToneLowerRight .o. lToneLowerLeft .o. lToneCleanup ];
define lToneLowering;

# Enclitics cause open-syllable, mid-tone verb stems to become high tone.
# Whenever an enclitic is present after a stem, the symbol "^Encl" is
# produced, which allows us to adjust the tone accordingly.
define encliticMidToHighTone a -> á, i -> í, o -> ó, u -> ú || _ "^Encl" .o.
                             "^Encl" -> 0;


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to consonants.
#

# Stems that begin with /l/ combine with 2PL as- either as (a|à)ł or, for
# some speakers, as (a|à)stł (e.g., /as+lí/ "you.PL are" -> [ałí] or [astłí]).
# We use the symbol 's2' to represent the /s/ in any 2PL inflectional chunks
# that are involved in this process.
define lInitialStemsSbjPl2 s2 l -> [ ł | s l ] ;

# Phonotactic restriction: in general, /sl/ and /sł/ sequences should be
# resolved as /stł/ (e.g., /is+lí/ "I am" -> [istłí], /ídis+łù/ "I am driving"
# -> [ídistłù]).
define slDissimilation s [ l | ł ] -> s t ł;

# Some <y>-initial stems alternate with <sh> when preceded by /s/ (e.g., -yón
# "grow (perfective)", as in nìsishón "I grew up" vs. sìsíyón "you (sg.) grew
# up").  We represent the <y> in these stems in lexical entries as <y2>, then
# define the corresponding phonological alternation here.
define y2InitialStemAfterS [ s "y2" -> s h  .o.  "y2" -> y ];

# Some stems containing the vowel <a> alternate with <o> when preceded by
# <sh> (e.g., -yá(h) "walk, go (human non-pl.)", as in dishó "I will walk, go"
# and dashó "you (2) will walk, go" vs. díyá "you (sg.) will walk, go").  We
# treat this here as a productive alternation with the special character "^A",
# though in actuality, this 'process' is limited to a very small set of 
# lexemes.
define aVowelAlternation a -> o, á -> ó, à -> ò || s h _ "^A" .o. "^A" -> 0 ;

# Some stems ending in /n/ may appear with or without that consonant when it
# occurs word-finally (e.g., sistí ~ sistín "I am sleeping") or before an
# enclitic (e.g., sití-la ~ sitín-la "it was lying there (living being)").
# That same /n/ # is always present when it is not in word-final position
# (e.g., when a suffix is present, e.g,. sistíní dósa "because I am sleeping",
# not *sistíí dósa).
#
# We represent the alternating word-final /n/ found in these stems as <n2> in
# lexical entries, then handle the corresponding phonological alternation here.
define n2FinalStems [ "n2" -> [ 0 | n ] || _ [ .#. | "-" ]  .o.  "n2" -> n ];

# Change szh -> sh (mách'ìguniszhoh -> mách'ìgunisshoh "I don't know") (This
# rule may need to change; some people prefer to spell these forms without the
# second /s/)
define zhDevoicing z -> s || s _ h;

# Change sz -> ss (dìszày -> dìssày "he/she/it went hunting") (This rule may
# need to change; some people prefer to spell these forms without the second
# /s/)
define zDevoicing z -> s || s _;

# Change sgh -> sx (isghàł -> isxàł "I am whipping (something), cracking a
# whip"; cf. isaàghàł "we are whipping (something), cracking a whip")
##define ghDevoicing {gh} -> x || s _;


#
# Morphophonological adjustments to vowel length and quality.
#

# Outside of TAMA-initial contexts, /i/ assimilates to the height and backness
# of any immediately preceding /a/, /o/, or /u/, but retains its tone and mora.
define iAssimilation í -> á, i -> a, ì -> à || [á|a|à] _ .o.
                     í -> ó, i -> o, ì -> ò || [ó|o|ò] _ .o.
                     í -> ú, i -> u, ì -> ù || [ú|u|ù] _;

# When /i/ appears before an /i/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with indefinite object
# i-), then we need to make sure that the first /i/ picks up the tone and
# length of the TAMA chunk.
define iTAMAAssimilation                  í "." i i -> í í   .o.
                          [ í "." [í|i] | i "." í ] -> í     .o.
                                          i "." i   -> i     .o.
                                          i "." i2  -> i2;

# When /u/ appears before an /i/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with areal gu-), then
# we need to make sure that the /u/ picks up the tone from the /i/.
define uTAMAAssimilation [ u "." i | ú "." ì | ù "." í ] -> u  .o.
                         [ u "." í | ú "." í | ú "." i ] -> ú  .o.
                         [ u "." ì | ù "." i | ù "." ì ] -> ù;

# When /á/ appears before /ii/ or /i/ in a TAMA chunk (e.g., with the inner
# prefix ná- in násʔí "look at"), we need to make sure that the /á/ becomes
# long before /ii/ and picks up the appropriate tone.
define aTAMAAssimilation [ á "." í í | á "." i i | á "." á á ] -> á á  .o.
                         [ á "." í   | á "." i   | á "." á   ] -> á    .o.
                           a "." í                             -> á    .o.
                           a "." i i                           -> a a  .o.
                           a "." i                             -> a;

# In complex prefix combinations, we can sometimes end up with a sequence
# of three adjacent vowels (e.g., dà- í- isaà-, as in daásaàzi "we are all
# calling him/her/it"). If the last vowel is an /i/, we can safely drop it.
define noThreeVowelSequences i -> 0 || vowel vowel _;

# /u/ before /a/ is realized as a glide, but may still contribute a high tone
# to the following vowel.  Change uá -> wá, ua -> wa, uà -> wà (mid-tone u,
# e.g., gwàgúdìlo "someone is sick" < gu- àgúdìlo), as well as úá -> wá, 
# úa -> wá (high-tone u, e.g., kwásdàł "you (pl.) go in" < kú- asdàł).
# 
# (Phoneticlaly, /wa/ can be realized as [wa] or [ɔa]~[ɔˑ], but this isn't
# represented orthographically).
define uGliding u -> w || _ [á|a|à] .o. ú [a|á] -> w á;

# Change iò -> ò, io -> o, ió -> ó (e.g., mi-oghà -> moghà) and uò -> ò,
# uo -> o, uó -> ó (e.g., gu-oghà -> goghà; both cases mostly apply to oblique
# object markers, where this phonological context typically arises).
define uDeletionBeforeO u -> 0 || _ [ó|o|ò];

# 2PL <as2> doesn't contribute a mora to any preceding prefix, (e.g., dàłí
# "you (pl.) are" < dà- ałí, rather than *dàałí), but it does still cause
# manner assimilation (e.g., dastł'áh "you (pl.) run" < di- astłáh).
define assimilationBefore2PL í -> á, i -> a, ì -> à || _ [á|a|à]+ s2;
# TODO: what to do with às2-? (depends on treatment of transitional ì-)
define reduce2PLAfterVowel a -> 0 || vowel _ s2;

# Short /i/ deletes before non-/i/ vowels.
define iDeletionBeforeOtherVowels i -> 0 || _ [á|a|à|ó|o|ò|ú|u|ù];


#
# FST-internal symbol mangling.
#

# Some lexical entries include "^L" immediately before the inner-prefix
# boundary marker "." (e.g., "ta=di^L.ʔò"), rather than as part of one of the
# inflectional classes that produce "^L" after that marker (e.g., isi-PFV).
# Shifting the "^L" to always appear after that boundary marker makes several
# of the other tone-related rules defined here more straightforward to apply.
define putLToneAfterInnerPrefixBoundaryMarker "^L" "." -> "." "^L";
